Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1210
Taxable tangible personal property in transit; where listed and assessed.

Taxable tangible personal property in transit shall be listed and assessed in the tax district where the owner resides, but if such property is intended for a business, it shall be listed and assessed in the tax district where the property of such business is required to be listed.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 36, p. 396;

R.S.1913, § 6321;

C.S.1922, § 5922;

C.S.1929, § 77-1409;

R.S.1943, § 77-1210;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 42;

Laws 2008, LB965, § 5.

Legislature has provided that situs of personal property of kind described in this section shall control over residence and domicile of owner. International Harvester Co. v. County of Douglas, 146 Neb. 555, 20 N.W.2d 620 (1945).